Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2417
Solid waste disposal project, defined.

Solid waste disposal project shall mean any plant, works, systems, facilities, and real and personal property of any nature whatsoever, together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, or any interest therein or right to capacity thereof, used or useful in the collection, transporting, conveying, treatment, transformation, or disposal of solid wastes.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 17.